Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Chapter 35. Municipal Powers and Duties.

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 167 — 204, 384 et seq.

Estoppel as to claim against municipality. 1 ALR2d 338.

Contributory negligence as defense in action by municipality. 1 ALR2d 827.

Granting or taking of lease by municipality as within authorization of purchase or acquisition thereof. 11 ALR2d 168.

Compromise of claim, power of city as to. 15 ALR2d 1359.

Liability of municipality owning public ball park for injuries by ball to person on nearby premises. 16 ALR2d 1458.

Death action against municipal corporation as subject to statute of limitations governing wrongful death actions or that governing actions against a municipality for injury to person or property. 53 ALR2d 1068.

Mandamus, liability of municipal corporation for damages to successful plaintiff or relator in. 73 ALR2d 903, 34 ALR4th 457.

Waiver of, or estoppel to rely upon, contractual limitation of time for bringing action against municipality or other political subdivision. 81 ALR2d 1039.

Pledging parking meter revenues as unlawful relinquishment of governmental power. 83 ALR2d 649.

Revocation, prior to execution of formal written contract, of vote for decision of public body awarding contract to bidder. 3 ALR3d 864.

Power of municipal corporation to submit to arbitration. 20 ALR3d 569.

Right of municipal corporation to recover back from contractor payments made under contract violating competitive bidding statute.
33 ALR3d 397.

Liability of municipality on quasi contract for value of property or work furnished without compliance with bidding requirements. 33 ALR3d 1164.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance providing for repair or destruction of residential building by public authorities at owner’s expense. 43 ALR3d 916.

Right of governmental entity to maintain action for defamation. 45 A.L.R.3d 1315.

Recovery of exemplary or punitive damages from municipal corporation. 1 ALR4th 448.

Curve warnings or markings, governmental duty to provide. 57 ALR4th 342.

Local government tort liability: Minority as affecting notice of claim requirement. 58 ALR4th 402.

Roller skater, governmental tort liability for injury allegedly caused by sidewalk or street defect. 58 ALR4th 1197.

Liability of school authorities for hiring or retaining incompetent or otherwise unsuitable teacher. 60 ALR4th 260.

State and local government liability for injury or death of bicyclist due to defect or obstruction in public bicycle path. 68 ALR4th 204.

Governmental liability for negligence in licensing, regulating, or supervising private day-care home in which child is injured. 68 ALR4th 266.

Municipal liability for negligent fire inspection and subsequent enforcement. 73 ALR4th 496.

Liability of local government entity for injury resulting from use of outdoor playground equipment at municipality owned park or recreation area. 73 ALR4th 496.

Governmental tort liability for detour accidents. 1 ALR5th 163.

Supreme Court’s views as to who is “person” subject to liability under civil rights statute (42 USCS § 1983) providing private right of action for violation of federal rights. 105 L. Ed. 721.

Standing of local government, or agency thereof to bring suit under Civil Rights Act of 1871 (42 USCS § 1983). 106 ALR Fed. 586.